Ohio, session 136, HB399.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 1505.07 be amended and section 5
1509.023 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: 6
Sec. 1505.07. (A) Subject to the limitation limitations 7
set forth in division (B) of this section and in section 1505.08 8
of the Revised Code, the director of natural resources, with the 9
approval of the director of environmental protection, the 10
attorney general, and the governor, may issue permits and make 11
leases to parties making application for permission to take and 12
remove sand, gravel, stone, and other minerals or substances 13
from and under the bed of Lake Erie, either upon a royalty or 14
rental basis, as he the director of natural resources determines 15
to be best for the state. Permits shall be issued for terms of 16
not less than one year nor more than ten years, and leases shall 17
be for a term of years or until the economic extraction of the 18
mineral or other substance covered thereby has been completed. 19

H. B. No. 399 Page 2
As Introduced
Such taking and removal shall be within certain fixed boundaries 20
that do not conflict with the rights of littoral owners. Upon 21
request from the holder of a permit, it shall be canceled, but 22
in the case of any permit or lease, any equipment or buildings 23
owned by the permittee or lessee shall be held as security by 24
the director of natural resources for payment of all rentals or 25
royalties due the state at the time of cancellation. 26
(B) Notwithstanding any section of the Revised Code to the 27
contrary, the director of natural resources or any other state 28
authority shall not issue any permit or make any lease to take 29
or remove oil or natural gas from and under the bed of Lake 30
Erie. 31
(C) No person shall remove sand, gravel, stone, or other 32
minerals or substances from and under the bed of Lake Erie 33
without first obtaining a permit or lease therefor from the 34
director. 35
(D) The director of natural resources may, in accordance 36
with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, adopt, amend, and rescind 37
rules for the administration, implementation, and enforcement of 38
this section. 39
Sec. 1509.023. Notwithstanding any section of the Revised 40
Code to the contrary, the director of natural resources or any 41
other state authority shall not issue any permit, make any 42
lease, or otherwise grant authorization to take or remove oil or 43
natural gas from and under any state park established under 44
Chapter 1546. of the Revised Code. 45
Section 2. That existing section 1505.07 of the Revised 46
Code is hereby repealed. 47